Massachusetts, session 194th, H943.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 129 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 39A the
following section:-
Section 39B. (a) As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Animal rescue organization”, an entity that is not otherwise required to be licensed
pursuant to sections 39, 39A or 45, or section 152A of chapter 94, and whose primary activity is
the placement of abandoned, displaced, unwanted, neglected or abused domestic animals,
including dogs; provided, that an animal rescue organization shall not obtain dogs from a breeder
or broker for payment or compensation; and provided, further that an animal rescue organization
of 2

shall be exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code or
equivalent nonprofit designation under said Code.
“Dog”, a mammal of the species Canis familiaris
“Quarantine”, the confinement of a dog, for the purposes of: (1) observing if the dog
displays signs of contagious or infectious illness and (2) minimizing the risk of the dog spreading
such contagious or infectious illness to humans and other animals.
(b) A dog brought into the commonwealth by an animal rescue organization from another
state for the purpose of permanent physical placement shall quarantine for not less than 48 hours
upon entry to the commonwealth. The quarantine may occur in the: (1) residence of the
permanent or temporary placement of the dog or (2) in a quarantine facility licensed by the
director. After quarantine, a veterinarian shall examine the dog and issue a certificate of health if
the dog does not display signs of contagious or infectious illness.
This subsection shall not apply to the voluntary, permanent surrender of a dog to an
animal rescue organization in the commonwealth by an individual owner if the owner resides in
Connecticut, Maine, New Hampshire, New York, Rhode Island or Vermont and the owner
provides transportation of the dog into the commonwealth.
(c) Any dog brought into the commonwealth shall be vaccinated for rabies, distemper,
parvovirus and leptospirosis. The director may require additional vaccination before a dog is
brought into the commonwealth.
(d) The director shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.
of 2